Wisconsin, session 2025, SB329.
do enact as follows:SB329,11Section 1. 16.316 of the statutes is created to read:SB329,2,7216.316 Grants for training law enforcement on extreme risk 3protection orders. The department shall award grants from the appropriation 4under s. 20.505 (1) (ft) to law enforcement agencies for the purpose of training law 5enforcement officers on filing petitions under s. 813.124 and identifying individuals 6who are substantially likely to injure themselves or another person if the individual 7possesses a firearm.SB329,28Section 2. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 9insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table SB329,316Section 3. 20.505 (1) (ft) of the statutes is created to read:SB329,2,181720.505 (1) (ft) Grants for training law enforcement on extreme risk protection 18orders. The amounts in the schedule for grants under s. 16.316.SB329,41Section 4. 165.63 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB329,3,52165.63 (3) Requests from courts. In making a determination required 3under s. 813.124 (7) (a), 813.1285 (7) (a), or 968.20 (1m) (d) 1., a judge or court 4commissioner shall request information under sub. (2) from the department or from 5a law enforcement agency or law enforcement officer as provided in sub. (4) (d).SB329,56Section 5. 165.63 (4) (d) of the statutes is amended to read:SB329,3,97165.63 (4) (d) Aid the court in making a determination required under s. 8813.124 (7) (a), 813.1285 (7) (a), or 968.20 (1m) (d) 1. or aid an entity in making a 9determination required under s. 968.20 (1m) (d) 2.SB329,610Section 6. 175.35 (1) (at) of the statutes is amended to read:SB329,4,411175.35 (1) (at) “Firearms restrictions record search” means a search of 12department of justice records to determine whether a person seeking to purchase a 13handgun is prohibited from possessing a firearm under s. 941.29. “Firearms 14restrictions record search” includes a criminal history record search, a search to 15determine whether a person is prohibited from possessing a firearm under s. 51.20 16(13) (cv) 1., 2007 stats., a search in the national instant criminal background check 17system to determine whether a person has been ordered not to possess a firearm 18under s. 51.20 (13) (cv) 1., 51.45 (13) (i) 1., 54.10 (3) (f) 1., or 55.12 (10) (a), a search 19to determine whether the person is subject to an injunction under s. 813.12 or 20813.122, or a tribal injunction, as defined in s. 813.12 (1) (e), issued by a court 21established by any federally recognized Wisconsin Indian tribe or band, except the 22Menominee Indian tribe of Wisconsin, that includes notice to the respondent that 23he or she is subject to the requirements and penalties under s. 941.29 and that has 1been filed with the circuit court under s. 813.128 (3g), a search to determine 2whether the person is subject to a temporary restraining order or injunction under 3s. 813.124, and a search to determine whether the person is prohibited from 4possessing a firearm under s. 813.123 (5m) or 813.125 (4m).SB329,75Section 7. 175.60 (9g) (a) 2. of the statutes is amended to read:SB329,5,26175.60 (9g) (a) 2. The department shall conduct a criminal history record 7search and shall search its records and conduct a search in the national instant 8criminal background check system to determine whether the applicant is 9prohibited from possessing a firearm under federal law; whether the applicant is 10prohibited from possessing a firearm under s. 941.29; whether the applicant is 11prohibited from possessing a firearm under s. 51.20 (13) (cv) 1., 2007 stats.; 12whether the applicant has been ordered not to possess a firearm under s. 51.20 (13) 13(cv) 1., 51.45 (13) (i) 1., 54.10 (3) (f) 1., or 55.12 (10) (a); whether the applicant is 14subject to an injunction under s. 813.12 or 813.122, or a tribal injunction, as defined 15in s. 813.12 (1) (e), issued by a court established by any federally recognized 16Wisconsin Indian tribe or band, except the Menominee Indian tribe of Wisconsin, 17that includes notice to the respondent that he or she is subject to the requirements 18and penalties under s. 941.29 and that has been filed with the circuit court under s. 19813.128 (3g); whether the applicant is subject to a temporary restraining order or 20injunction under s. 813.124; and whether the applicant is prohibited from 21possessing a firearm under s. 813.123 (5m) or 813.125 (4m); and to determine if the 22court has prohibited the applicant from possessing a dangerous weapon under s. 1969.02 (3) (c) or 969.03 (1) (c) and if the applicant is prohibited from possessing a 2dangerous weapon as a condition of release under s. 969.01.SB329,83Section 8. 175.60 (11) (a) 2. f. of the statutes is amended to read:SB329,5,64175.60 (11) (a) 2. f. The individual becomes subject to an a temporary 5restraining order or injunction described in s. 941.29 (1m) (f) or is ordered not to 6possess a firearm under s. 813.123 (5m) or 813.125 (4m).SB329,97Section 9. 801.50 (5sb) of the statutes is created to read:SB329,5,98801.50 (5sb) Venue of an action under s. 813.124 shall be in the county in 9which the cause of action arose or where the petitioner or the respondent resides.SB329,1010Section 10. 801.58 (2m) of the statutes is amended to read:SB329,5,1811801.58 (2m) If, under sub. (2), the judge determines that the request for 12substitution was made timely and in proper form, any ex parte order granted by the 13original judge remains in effect according to the terms, except that a temporary 14restraining order issued under s. 813.12 (3), 813.122 (4), 813.123 (4), 813.124 (2t), 15or 813.125 (3) by the original judge is extended until the newly assigned judge holds 16a hearing on the issuance of an injunction. The newly assigned judge shall hear any 17subsequent motion to modify or vacate any ex parte order granted by the original 18judge.SB329,1119Section 11. 813.06 of the statutes is amended to read:SB329,6,620813.06 Security for damages. In proceedings under s. 767.225 the court or 21judge may, and in all other proceedings except proceedings under ss. 813.12, 22813.122, 813.124, 813.125 and 823.113 the court or judge shall, require a bond of 23the party seeking an injunction, with sureties, to the effect that he or she will pay to 1the party enjoined such damages, not exceeding an amount to be specified, as he or 2she may sustain by reason of the injunction if the court finally decides that the 3party was not entitled thereto. Copies of such bond, affidavit or other pleading 4shall be served upon the party enjoined and the officer serving the same shall, 5within 8 days after such service, file his or her return in the office of the clerk of the 6court.SB329,127Section 12. 813.124 of the statutes is created to read:SB329,6,98813.124 Extreme risk protection temporary restraining orders and 9injunctions. (1) Definitions. In this section:SB329,6,1010(a) “Family or household member” means any of the following:SB329,6,11111. A person related by blood, adoption, or marriage to the respondent.SB329,6,13122. A person with whom the respondent has or had a dating relationship, as 13defined in s. 813.12 (1) (ag), or with whom the respondent has a child in common.SB329,6,15143. A person who resides with, or within the 6 months before filing a petition, 15had resided with, the respondent.SB329,6,16164. A domestic partner under ch. 770 of the respondent.SB329,6,19175. A person who is acting or has acted as the respondent’s legal guardian or 18who is or was a foster parent or other physical custodian described in s. 48.62 (2) of 19the respondent.SB329,6,22206. A person for whom the respondent is acting or has acted as a legal guardian 21or for whom the respondent is or was the foster parent or other physical custodian 22described in s. 48.62 (2).SB329,6,2323(b) “Firearms dealer” has the meaning given in s. 175.35 (1) (ar).SB329,7,11(c) “Law enforcement officer” has the meaning given in s. 165.85 (2) (c).SB329,7,42(2) Commencement of action and response. No action under this section 3may be commenced by complaint and summons. An action under this section may 4be commenced only by a petition described under sub. (4) (a).SB329,7,55(2m) Procedure. Procedure for an action under this section is as follows:SB329,7,156(a) If the petitioner requests an extreme risk protection temporary restraining 7order, the court shall consider the request as provided under sub. (2t). If the court 8issues a temporary restraining order, the court shall set forth the date, which must 9be within 14 days of issuing the temporary restraining order, for the hearing on the 10injunction and shall forward a copy of the temporary restraining order, the 11injunction hearing date, and the petition to the appropriate law enforcement agency 12with jurisdiction over the respondent’s residence. The law enforcement agency 13shall immediately, or as soon as practicable, serve it on the respondent. If personal 14service cannot be effected upon the respondent, the court may order other 15appropriate service.SB329,7,2316(b) The court shall hold a hearing under sub. (3) on whether to issue an 17extreme risk protection injunction, which is the final relief. If there was no 18temporary restraining order, the respondent shall be served notice of the petition by 19a law enforcement officer and the date for the hearing shall be set upon motion by 20either party. If personal service cannot be effected upon the respondent, the court 21may order other appropriate service. The service shall include the name of the 22respondent and of the petitioner, and, if known, notice of the date, time, and place of 23the injunction hearing.SB329,8,21(c) When the respondent is served under this subsection, the respondent shall 2be provided notice of the requirements and penalties under s. 941.29. Down Down /2025/related/proposals/sb329 true proposaltext /2025/related/proposals/sb329 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB329 proposaltext/2025/REG/SB329 section true Menu»2025»Related Documents»Proposal Text»SB329: Bill Text × Details for PDF view Link (Permanent link) Bookmark this location View toggle Go to top of document Search in this chapter Search in this section Search in this agency Search in this chapter group Search in this chapter Search in this section Cross references for section Acts affecting this section References to this 1970 Statutes Annotations Appellate Court Citations Administrative Code Index Reference lines Clear highlighting